Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1053
Flood control funds; certification to districts.

The county treasurer shall, immediately after making the apportionment under section 79-1052, enter the apportionment in a book kept for that purpose. The county treasurer shall also furnish the school board secretary in each district in the county a certificate showing the amount due such district, which amount shall be subject to the order of the school district, through its proper officers, on the county treasurer.

Laws 1949, c. 251, § 5, p. 684;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1319;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 699;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 106.